apertium-nob.nob.dix
<pardef n="numeros">
  <!-- separate out the number 1 as singular (fortunately "1.00" is usually plural!) -->
  <e>       <re>1( ?%)?</re><p><l></l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[02-9]+( ?%)?</re><p><l></l>             <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][0-9]+( ?%)?</re><p><l></l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)+( ?%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <re>[0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)* (tusen|[mb]illi(on|ard)er)</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <re>[½¹²³¼¾]</re><p><l></l>                  <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <!-- Numbers from 1000 to 2200 (or 20-99) might be years. Other numbers don't get to be years.
       Noun tagging would be better, but that doesn’t work with compounding
       since inconditional numerals override the unknown-analysis. -->
  <e c="date"><re>1[0-9][0-9][0-9]|2[0-2][0-9][0-9]|[2-9][0-9]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="date"/></r></p></e>
  <e c="section"> <re>[0-9]+[\-][0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <re>1</re><p><l></l>                        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/></r></p>  <par n="."/></e>
  <e>       <re>[02-9]</re><p><l></l>                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>  <par n="."/></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][0-9]+([., ][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>  <par n="."/></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][., ][0-9]+</re><p><l></l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/></r></p>  <par n="."/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="detpos-m" c="determinativ possessiv">
  <e><i>sin</i></e>
  <e><i>min</i></e>
  <e><i>din</i></e>
  <e><i>hans</i></e>
  <e><i>hennes</i></e>
  <e><i>vår</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="detpos-f" c="determinativ possessiv">
  <e><i>si</i></e>
  <e><i>mi</i></e>
  <e><i>di</i></e>
  <e><i>hans</i></e>
  <e><i>hennes</i></e>
  <e><i>vår</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="detpos-nt" c="determinativ possessiv">
  <e><i>sitt</i></e>
  <e><i>mitt</i></e>
  <e><i>ditt</i></e>
  <e><i>hans</i></e>
  <e><i>hennes</i></e>
  <e><i>vårt</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <p><l>..</l><r>..<s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>...</l><r>...<s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!…¿¶\|]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>/</l><r>/<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
  <e c="left quote">             <p><l>‘</l>     <r>‘<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
  <e c="right quote / genitive"> <p><l>’</l>     <r>’<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
  <e c="foot">                   <p><l>'</l>     <r>'<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>«</l><r>«<s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>»</l><r>»<s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>“</l><r>“<s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>”</l><r>”<s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>"</l><r>“<s n="lquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>"</l><r>”<s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>”<b/></l><r>”<b/><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e> <!-- help disambig: with following space it can only be rquot -->
  <e r="LR"><p><l>"<b/></l><r>”<b/><s n="rquot"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[{]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]}]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cardinals">
  <e lm="ett">            <i>ett</i></e>
  <e lm="et">             <i>et</i></e>
  <e lm="en">             <i>en</i></e>
  <!--e lm="halvannet">      <i>halvannet</i></e-->
  <e lm="to">             <i>to</i></e>
  <e lm="to og et halvt"> <i>to<b/>og<b/>et<b/>halvt</i></e>
  <e lm="tre">            <i>tre</i></e>
  <e lm="tre og et halvt"><i>tre<b/>og<b/>et<b/>halvt</i></e>
  <e lm="fire">           <i>fire</i></e>
  <e lm="fem">            <i>fem</i></e>
  <e lm="seks">           <i>seks</i></e>
  <e lm="sju">            <i>sju</i></e>
  <e lm="syv">            <i>syv</i></e>
  <e lm="åtte">           <i>åtte</i></e>
  <e lm="ni">             <i>ni</i></e>
  <e lm="ti">             <i>ti</i></e>
  <e lm="elleve">         <i>elleve</i></e>
  <e lm="tolv">           <i>tolv</i></e>
  <e lm="tretten">        <i>tretten</i></e>
  <e lm="fjorten">        <i>fjorten</i></e>
  <e lm="femten">         <i>femten</i></e>
  <e lm="seksten">        <i>seksten</i></e>
  <e lm="sytten">         <i>sytten</i></e>
  <e lm="atten">          <i>atten</i></e>
  <e lm="nitten">         <i>nitten</i></e>
  <e lm="tyve">           <i>tyve</i></e>
  <e lm="tjue">           <i>tjue</i></e>
  <e lm="tjuefem">        <i>tjuefem</i></e>
  <e lm="femogtyve">      <i>femogtyve</i></e>
  <e lm="tredve">         <i>tredve</i></e>
  <e lm="tretti">         <i>tretti</i></e>
  <e lm="førti">          <i>førti</i></e>
  <e lm="femti">          <i>femti</i></e>
  <e lm="seksti">         <i>seksti</i></e>
  <e lm="sytti">          <i>sytti</i></e>
  <e lm="åtti">           <i>åtti</i></e>
  <e lm="nitti">          <i>nitti</i></e>
  <e lm="hundre">         <i>hundre</i></e>
  <e lm="tusen">          <i>tusen</i></e>
  <e lm="titusener">      <i>titusener</i></e>
  <e lm="millioner">      <i>millioner</i></e>
  <e lm="0-9+ år lang"> <re>[0-9,.½]+</re></e>
</pardef>

	</pardefs>

<e lm="i sin hule hånd"><i>i<b/></i><par n="detpos-m"/><i><b/>hule<b/></i><par n="hånd"/><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sin høyre hånd"><par n="detpos-m"/><i><b/>høyre<b/></i><par n="hånd"/><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sitt sanne ansikt"><par n="detpos-nt"/><i><b/>sanne<b/>ansikt</i><par n="dagevis__adv"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
  <e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
